District of Columbia statutes.
22-3226.14

Fraud Prevention Fund.

(a)

There is established a Fraud Prevention Fund (“Fund”). This Fund shall be nonlapsing. Monies in the Fund shall not be commingled with the General Fund, nor shall the operation of the Fund impose a burden or charge on the General Fund.

(b)

Monies in the Fund shall consist of fines paid pursuant to this subchapter.

(c)

Monies from this fund may be used for the purposes of educating the public regarding fraud and crime prevention, supporting the task force to combat fraud, and enforcing this subchapter.

(d)

The District of Columbia Auditor shall perform an annual audit of the Fraud Prevention Fund.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 126n
as added June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 102, 47 DCR 7039

History

This section is referenced in § 22-3226.09.

Section References